Connecticut, session 2026, SB00344.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Affirmative consent" means a written agreement under which a
parent or guardian of a child allows for the photographing or video
recording of such child for the purpose of using such child's name,
image or likeness in the promotion of any organization, product, service
or event;
(2) "Agreement" means a contract between the parent or guardian of
a child and another person;
(3) "Person" means an individual, a business, corporation, limited
liability company, union, association, firm, partnership, committee, club
or other organization or group of persons; and
SB344 / File No. 50 1

SB344 File No. 50
(4) "Social media" means an electronic medium where users may
create and view user-generated content, such as uploaded or
downloaded videos or still photographs, blogs, video blogs, podcasts or
instant messages.
(b) No person shall use a child's name, image or likeness for purposes
of marketing or advertising on social media or otherwise unless the
parent or guardian of such child provides affirmative consent.
(c) No person shall deny or limit a child from participating in an
organization or event or from using a product or service if the parent or
guardian of such child does not provide affirmative consent.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Affirmative consent" means a written agreement under which a
parent or guardian of a child allows for the photographing or video
recording of such child for the purpose of using such child's name,
image or likeness in the promotion of any organization, product, service
or event;
(2) "Agreement" means a contract between the parent or guardian of
a child and a local or regional board of education, interdistrict magnet
school operator, governing council of a charter school or supervisory
agent of a nonpublic school; and
(3) "Social media" means an electronic medium where users may
create and view user-generated content, such as uploaded or
downloaded videos or still photographs, blogs, video blogs, podcasts or
instant messages.
(b) No local or regional board of education, interdistrict magnet
school operator, governing council of a charter school or supervisory
agent of a nonpublic school shall use a child's name, image or likeness
for purposes of marketing or advertising on social media or otherwise
unless the parent or guardian of such child provides affirmative
consent.
SB344 / File No. 50 2

SB344 File No. 50
(c) No local or regional board of education, interdistrict magnet
school operator, governing council of a charter school or supervisory
agent of a nonpublic school shall deny or limit a child from any school
activities, services or events because the parent or guardian of such child
does not provide affirmative consent.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
KID Joint Favorable
SB344 / File No. 50 3

SB344 File No. 50
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires a parent or guardian to provide written consent to
use a child's name, image, or likeness for marketing or on social media,
which does not result in a fiscal impact. It is anticipated that schools and
other entities can meet the requirement to obtain consent through
existing resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB344 / File No. 50 4

SB344 File No. 50
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 344
AN ACT PROTECTING CHILDREN'S SAFETY BY REQUIRING
AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT BY A PARENT OR GUARDIAN FOR THE
USE OF A CHILD'S LIKENESS ON SOCIAL MEDIA.